Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 3 OIL AND GAS WELLS — GEOLOGIC INFORMATION, AND PREVENTION OF WASTE
§ 47-328. Rules for commission — Administrative procedures.

The commission shall have authority to hear rulemaking proceedings, complaints filed with it pursuant to this chapter and appeals from the oil and gas administrator’s decision on an application filed pursuant to this chapter, and any other matter the commission decides should be heard by the commission. The commission may act on its own motion. The commission may prescribe rules governing the procedure before it, subject to the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Provided however, that no rulemaking except for that done under section 67-5226, Idaho Code, may be conducted for twelve (12) months beginning on July 1, 2017.

In all cases where a complaint is made by the commission or any person that any provision of this act or any rule or order of the commission is being violated, the commission shall serve notice of any hearing to be held on such application or complaint to the interested persons by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in the same manner as is provided in the rules of civil procedure for the service of summons in civil actions. Where the interested person is unknown or cannot be located, the commission shall serve notice by publishing at least one (1) notice of the hearing to such person in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the affected tract is located. Such notice must be sent, delivered or published, as appropriate, at least five (5) business days before the date of the hearing.

Except as provided in section 47-316(1)(a), Idaho Code, and subsection (2) of this section, any request for an order related to oil and gas activities within the commission’s jurisdiction, other than a civil penalty proceeding pursuant to section 47-329, Idaho Code, or other enforcement action by the department of lands or the commission, shall be made by application to the department of lands and processed as provided in this section.

The department shall notify the applicant within five (5) business days of receipt of an application if additional information is required for the department to evaluate the application.

For applications involving an order regarding unit operations or integration of a drilling unit, the applicant shall send a copy of the application and supporting documents to all known and located uncommitted owners, to all working interest owners within the unit, and to the respective city or county where the proposed unit is located. The mailing shall be sent by certified mail within seven (7) calendar days of filing the application and include notice of the hearing date on which the oil and gas administrator will consider the application. For any uncommitted owners and working interest owners who cannot be located, an applicant shall publish notice of any application for an order, notice of hearing and response deadline once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the affected property is located and request the department publish notice on its website within seven (7) calendar days of filing of the application. Only an uncommitted owner in the affected unit may file an objection or other response to the application, and the uncommitted owner shall file at least fourteen (14) calendar days before the hearing date provided in the notice.

For applications not involving paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department and any uncommitted owner within the area defined in the application may file objections or other responses to the application and shall file at least fourteen (14) calendar days before the hearing date provided in the notice.

The oil and gas administrator shall hear the application and make a decision on the application’s merits. The oil and gas administrator shall set regular hearing dates. Applications shall be filed at least forty-five (45) calendar days before a desired hearing date. Untimely applications shall be continued until the next hearing. The oil and gas administrator may for good cause continue any hearing. The oil and gas administrator may appoint a hearing officer, who shall have the power and authority to conduct hearings. Discovery is not permitted. The department may appear and testify at the hearing. When applications are uncontested, the applicant may request, and the oil and gas administrator may allow, approval without a hearing based on review of the merits of a verified application and the supporting exhibits.

The oil and gas administrator shall issue a written decision on any such application within thirty (30) calendar days of the hearing. The oil and gas administrator’s decision shall not be subject to any motion for reconsideration or further review, except for appeal to the commission provided in subsection (4) of this section.

The oil and gas administrator’s decision on an application or a request for an order may be appealed to the commission by the applicant or any owner who filed an objection or other response to the application within the time required. An appeal must be filed with the oil and gas administrator within fourteen (14) calendar days of the date of issuance of the oil and gas administrator’s written decision. The date of issuance shall be three (3) calendar days after the oil and gas administrator deposits the decision in the U.S. mail, or the date on which he remits a decision electronically. Such appeal shall include the reasons and authority for the appeal and shall identify any facts in the record supporting the appeal. Any person appealing shall serve a copy of the appeal materials on any other person who participated in the proceedings, by certified mail, or by personal service. Any person who participated in the proceeding may file a response to the appeal within five (5) business days of service of a copy of the appeal materials. The appellant shall provide the oil and gas administrator with proof of service of the appeal materials on other persons as required in this section. The commission shall make a decision based on the record as set forth in the written submittals of only the appellant and any other participating qualified person, the oil and gas administrator’s decision, and any oral argument taken by the commission at an appeal hearing.

Appeals to the commission shall be heard at the next regularly scheduled commission hearing, or at a special meeting of the commission if determined by the commission. In no case will a hearing be later than thirty (30) calendar days after the filing of an appeal. The commission may take argument from, but not new testimony of, the appellant and other qualified participating persons at the hearing. The commission shall make a decision on the appeal at the hearing and issue a written order within five (5) business days of the hearing. The prevailing party shall draft a proposed written order and submit it within two (2) business days. The final order of the commission shall not be subject to any motion for reconsideration.

If no appeal is filed with the commission within the required time, the decision of the oil and gas administrator shall become the final order.

Judicial review of actions taken by the commission shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

For an application or request for an order submitted under subsection (3) of this section, only a person qualified under subsection (4) of this section who has completed the appeal procedures set forth in this section shall be considered to have exhausted administrative remedies as required in section 67-5271, Idaho Code.
(9) Each order shall include a reasoned statement in support of the decision, including a concise statement of facts supporting any findings, a statement of available procedures and time limits for appeals. Findings must be based exclusively on materials in the record. The applicant and any participating qualified person shall be served with a copy of the order. The order shall include or be accompanied by a certificate of service.

Each order shall include a reasoned statement in support of the decision, including a concise statement of facts supporting any findings, a statement of available procedures and time limits for appeals. Findings must be based exclusively on materials in the record. The applicant and any participating qualified person shall be served with a copy of the order. The order shall include or be accompanied by a certificate of service.

Every application shall be signed by the applicant or his representative, and his address shall be stated thereon. The signature of the applicant or his representative constitutes a certificate by him that he has read the application and that to the best of his knowledge, information and belief there is good ground to support the same. Each application shall be of such form and content and accompanied by the number of copies required by rule of the commission. Each application shall be accompanied by a fee as established in statute or rule.

§ 47-329. Powers of commission — Witnesses — Penalty.

The commission shall have the power to summon witnesses, to administer oaths, and to require the production of records, books, and documents for examination at any hearing or investigation conducted by the commission.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with a subpoena issued by the commission, or in case of refusal of any witness to testify as to any matter regarding which he may be interrogated, any district court in the state, upon the application of the commission, may issue an attachment for such person and compel him to comply with such subpoena, and to attend before the commission and produce such records, books, and documents for examination, and to give his testimony. Such court shall have the power to punish for contempt as in the case of disobedience to a like subpoena issued by the court, or for refusal to testify therein.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules or orders made or promulgated hereunder may be assessed a civil penalty by the commission or its duly authorized agent of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation and shall be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees. Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate and additional violation, punishable by separate and additional civil penalties in like amount or other like civil penalties as determined by the commission; provided that the civil penalties do not begin to accrue until the date notice of violation and opportunity to be heard are given.

Assessment of a civil penalty may be made in conjunction with any other commission administrative action.

No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, which civil penalty begins to accrue no earlier than the date notice of violation and opportunity for a hearing are given.

If the commission is unable to collect such penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commission, it may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court.

Any person against whom the commission has assessed a civil penalty under the provisions of this section may, within twenty-eight (28) days of the final action by the agency making the assessment, appeal the assessment to the district court of the county in which the violation is alleged by the commission to have occurred pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the oil and gas conservation fund.

Whenever it shall appear that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this act or any rule, regulation, or order made hereunder, the commission may bring a civil action in the name of the state against such person in the district court in the county of the residence of the defendant, or in the county of the residence of any defendant, if there be more than one (1) defendant, or in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit, the court may grant injunctions, prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions. In such suit, the commission may seek damages to recover costs caused by such violation including, but not limited to, costs of well control, spill response and cleanup, restoration of fresh waters, well plugging and abandonment, and reclamation of surface disturbance.
(5) Nothing in this act, and no suit by or against the commission, and no violation charged or asserted against any person under any provisions of this act, or any rule, regulation or order issued hereunder, shall impair or abridge or delay any cause of action for damages which any person may have or assert against any person violating any provision of this act, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder. Any person so damaged by the violation may sue for and recover such damages as he otherwise may be entitled to receive. In the event the commission shall fail to bring suit to enjoin any actual or threatened violation of this act, or of any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, then any person or party in interest adversely affected and who has, ten (10) days or more prior thereto, notified the commission in writing of such violation or threat thereof and has requested the commission to sue, may, to prevent any or further violation, bring suit for that purpose in the district court of any county in which the commission could have brought suit.

Nothing in this act, and no suit by or against the commission, and no violation charged or asserted against any person under any provisions of this act, or any rule, regulation or order issued hereunder, shall impair or abridge or delay any cause of action for damages which any person may have or assert against any person violating any provision of this act, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder. Any person so damaged by the violation may sue for and recover such damages as he otherwise may be entitled to receive. In the event the commission shall fail to bring suit to enjoin any actual or threatened violation of this act, or of any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, then any person or party in interest adversely affected and who has, ten (10) days or more prior thereto, notified the commission in writing of such violation or threat thereof and has requested the commission to sue, may, to prevent any or further violation, bring suit for that purpose in the district court of any county in which the commission could have brought suit.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, or any of the rules promulgated hereunder for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, or who knowingly fails or refuses to comply with any requirements herein specified, or who knowingly interferes with the commission, its agents, designees or employees in the execution or on account of the execution of its or their duties under this chapter or rules promulgated hereunder, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned in a county jail for not more than twelve (12) months, or be subject to both such fine and imprisonment.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the commission to report minor violations for prosecution when it believes that the public interest will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

§ 47-330. Oil and gas conservation fund created — Tax.

For the purposes of paying the expenses of administration of this act and for the privilege of extracting oil and gas in this state, there is hereby levied and imposed on all oil and gas produced, saved and sold or transported from the premises in Idaho where produced a tax of two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the gross income received by the producer of the oil and gas produced. “Gross income” shall mean the amount realized by the producer for sale of the oil and gas, whether the sale occurs at the wellhead or after transportation of the product, without deduction for marketing, transportation, manufacturing, and processing costs borne by the producer. Where the parties to the sale are related parties and the sales price is lower than the price for which that oil and gas could otherwise have been sold to a ready, willing, and able buyer and where the taxpayer was legally able to sell the oil and gas to such a buyer, gross income shall be determined by reference to comparable arms-length sales of like kind, quality, and quantity in the same field or area. For purposes of this subsection, “related parties” shall be as defined in section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined, in section 63-3004, Idaho Code. This tax is in addition to all other taxes provided by law. It shall be the duty of the state tax commission to enforce collection of this tax and to make such rules as may be necessary, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. All money so collected shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the oil and gas conservation fund, which fund is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer of the state of Idaho.

The persons owning an interest, working interest, royalty interest, payments out of production, or any other interest in the oil and gas, or in the proceeds thereof, shall be liable for such tax in proportion to their ownership at the time of production. The tax so assessed and fixed shall be payable monthly, and the sum so due shall be remitted to the state tax commission, on or before the twentieth of the month following the month in which the tax accrued, by the producer on behalf of himself and all other interested persons. The person remitting the tax, as herein provided, is hereby empowered and required to deduct from any amounts due the persons owning an interest in the oil and gas, or in the proceeds thereof, at the time of production a proportionate amount of such tax before making payment to such persons.

The tax imposed by this section shall apply to all lands in the state of Idaho, anything in this act to the contrary notwithstanding; provided however, there shall be exempted from the tax hereinabove levied and assessed the following, to wit:

The interest of the United States of America and the interest of the state of Idaho and the political subdivisions thereof in any oil and gas or in the proceeds thereof.

The interest of any Indian or Indian tribe in any oil and gas or the proceeds thereof, produced from lands subject to the supervision of the United States.
(c) Oil and gas used in producing operations or for repressuring or recycling purposes.

To the extent that such sections are not in conflict with the provisions of this act, the deficiency in tax and notice of deficiency as well as the collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3040, 63-3042 through 63-3065A, 63-3068, 63-3071 and 63-3075 through 63-3078, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement of the provisions of this act and the assessment and collection of any amounts due. Said sections shall for this purpose be considered a part of this act and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection pursuant to this act, be described as an oil and gas tax lien or proceeding.

All moneys collected under this chapter shall be distributed by the state tax commission as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized under this chapter by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated.

For the balance of the proceeds, forty percent (40%) shall be distributed by the end of the month following each monthly due date by the state tax commission into any oil and gas revenue share account as follows:

Forty-four percent (44%) is hereby appropriated and shall be paid to the current expense fund of the county from which the oil and gas was produced, to be used to mitigate the impacts associated with oil and gas production, development and transportation in that county;

Twenty-eight percent (28%) is hereby appropriated and shall be paid to the cities within the county from which the oil and gas was produced. Such funds shall be distributed to each city based upon the proportion that the city’s population bears to the total population of all of the cities within the county; and

Twenty-eight percent (28%) is hereby appropriated and shall be paid to the public school income fund.

The remainder of the moneys deposited into the oil and gas conservation fund, sixty percent (60%) of the proceeds after refunds, may be expended pursuant to legislative appropriation and shall be used for defraying the expenses of the oil and gas conservation commission in carrying out the provisions of this act. At the beginning of each fiscal year, those moneys in the oil and gas conservation fund, after applicable refunds and distribution as noted in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, that exceed two hundred percent (200%) of the current year’s appropriations for the oil and gas conservation commission shall be transferred to the general fund. The oil and gas conservation commission shall audit all bills for salaries and expenses incurred in the enforcement of this act that may be payable from the oil and gas conservation fund that shall be audited, allowed and paid as to the claims against the state.

The state tax commission may be made a party defendant in an action at law or in equity by any person aggrieved by the unlawful seizure or sale of his property, or in any suit for refund or to recover an overpayment, but only the state of Idaho shall be responsible for any final judgment secured against the state tax commission, and said judgment or any other amount erroneously or illegally collected shall be paid or satisfied out of the state refund account created by section 63-3067, Idaho Code.

§ 47-331. Obligation to pay royalties as essence of contract — Interest.

The obligation arising under an oil and gas lease to pay oil and gas royalties to the royalty owner or the owner’s assignee, to deliver oil and gas to a purchaser to the credit of the royalty owner or the owner’s assignee, or to pay a portion of the proceeds of the sale of the oil and gas to the royalty owner or the owner’s assignee is of the essence in the lease contract.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties:

A royalty of no less than twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) of the oil and gas or natural gas plant liquids produced and saved shall be paid. The lessee shall make payments in legal tender unless written instructions for payment in kind have been provided.

Royalty shall be due on all production sold from the leased premises except on that consumed for the direct operation of the producing wells and that lost through no fault of the lessee.

If the operator under an oil and gas lease fails to pay oil and gas royalties to the royalty owner or the owner’s assignee within one hundred twenty (120) days after the first production of oil and gas under the lease is marketed, or within sixty (60) days for all oil and ninety (90) days for all gas produced and marketed thereafter, the unpaid royalties shall bear interest at the maximum rate of interest authorized under section 28-22-104(1), Idaho Code, from the date due until paid. Provided, however, that whenever the aggregate amount of royalties due to a royalty owner for a twelve (12) month period is less than one hundred dollars ($100), the operator may remit the royalties on an annual basis without any interest due.

A royalty owner seeking a remedy for failure to make payments under the lease or seeking payments under this section may file a complaint with the commission or may bring an action in the district court pursuant to section 47-333, Idaho Code. The prevailing party in any proceeding brought under this section is entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

This section does not apply if a royalty owner or the owner’s assignee has elected to take the owner’s or assignee’s proportionate share of production in kind or if there is a dispute as to the title of the minerals or entitlement to royalties, the outcome of which would affect distribution of royalty payments.

§ 47-332. Reports to royalty owners.

Each royalty payment shall be accompanied by an oil and gas royalty check stub that includes the following information:

Lease or well identification;

Month and year of sales included in the payment;

Total volumes of oil, condensate, natural gas liquids or other liquids sold in barrels or gallons, and gas in MCF;

Price per barrel, gallon, or MCF, including British thermal unit adjustment of gas sold;

Severance taxes attributable to said interest;

Net value of total sales attributed to such payment after deduction of severance taxes;

Owner’s interest in the well, expressed as a decimal to eight (8) places;

Royalty owner’s share of the total value of sales attributed to the payment before any deductions;

Royalty owner’s share of the sales value attributed to the payment, less the owner’s share of the severance taxes;

An itemized list of any other deductions; and

An address at which additional information pertaining to the royalty owner’s interest in production may be obtained and questions may be answered. If information is requested by certified mail, an answer must be mailed by certified mail within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request.

All revenue decimals shall be calculated to at least eight (8) decimal places.

All oil and gas volumes shall be measured by certified and proved meters.

The lessee must maintain, for a period of five (5) years, and make available to the lessor upon request, copies of all documents, records or reports confirming the gross production, disposition and market value including gas meter readings, pipeline receipts, gas line receipts and other checks or memoranda of the amount produced and put into pipelines, tanks, or pools and gas lines or gas storage, and any other reports or records that the lessor may require to verify the gross production, disposition and market value.

§ 47-333. Action for accounting for royalty.

Whenever an owner of a royalty interest makes a written demand for an accounting of the oil and gas produced, but no more frequently than once every twenty-four (24) months, and makes written demand for delivery or payment of his royalty as may then be due upon the person or persons obligated for the delivery or payment of the royalty, and the obligated persons then fail to make the accounting demanded and the payment or delivery of the royalty due within a period of ninety (90) days following the date upon which the demand is made, then the royalty owner may file an action in the district court of the county wherein the lands are located to compel the accounting demanded and to recover the payment or delivery of the royalty due against the person or persons obligated.

In such an action, the prevailing party or parties shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees to be allowed by the court, together with the costs allowed to a prevailing party, pursuant to section 12-120, Idaho Code.

The remedies under this section are not exclusive and do not abrogate any right or remedy under other laws of this state.

§ 47-334. Use of surface land by owner or operator.

For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Surface land” means land upon which oil and gas operations are conducted.

“Crops” means any growing vegetative matter used for an agricultural purpose, including forage for grazing and domesticated animals.

“Surface landowner” means a person who owns all or part of the surface land as shown by the records of the county in which the surface land is located. Surface landowner does not include the surface landowner’s lessee, renter, tenant or other contractually related person.

“Surface landowner’s property” means a surface landowner’s surface land, crops on the surface land and existing improvements on the surface land.

“Surface use agreement” means an agreement between an owner or operator and a surface landowner addressing the use and reclamation of surface land owned by the surface landowner and compensation for damage to the surface land caused by oil and gas operations that result in loss of the surface landowner’s crops on the surface land, loss of value of existing improvements owned by the surface landowner on the surface land and permanent damage to the surface land.

An owner or operator may:

Enter onto surface land under which the owner or operator holds rights to conduct oil and gas operations; and

Use the surface land:

To the extent reasonably necessary to conduct oil and gas operations; and

Consistent with allowing the surface landowner the greatest possible use of the surface landowner’s property, to the extent that the surface landowner’s use does not interfere with the owner’s or operator’s oil and gas operations.

Except as is reasonably necessary to conduct oil and gas operations, an owner or operator shall:

Mitigate the effects of accessing the surface landowner’s surface land;

Minimize the interference with the surface landowner’s use of the surface landowner’s property; and

Compensate a surface landowner for unreasonable:

Loss of a surface landowner’s crops on the surface land;

Loss of value to existing improvements owned by a surface landowner on the surface land; and

Permanent damage to the surface land.

For the purposes of this section, an owner or operator is not required to:

Obtain location or spacing exceptions from the department or commission; or

Utilize directional or horizontal drilling techniques that are not:

Technologically feasible;

Economically practicable; or

Reasonably available.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section do not apply to the extent that they conflict with or impair a contractual provision relevant to an owner’s or operator’s use of surface land for oil and gas operations.

The provisions of this section do not prevent:
(6)(a) The provisions of this section do not prevent:

A person from seeking a remedy allowed by law; or

An owner or operator and a surface landowner from addressing the use of surface land for oil and gas operations through a lease, a surface use agreement or another written contract.

An agreement described in paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection shall control:

The use of surface land for oil and gas operations; and

Compensation for damage to the surface land caused by oil and gas operations.

A nonbinding mediation may be requested by a surface landowner and an owner or operator by providing written notice to the other party if they are unable to agree on the amount of damages for unreasonable crop loss on the surface land, unreasonable loss of value to existing improvements owned by the surface landowner on the surface land, or unreasonable permanent damage to the surface land. A mediator may be mutually selected by a surface landowner and an owner or operator. The surface landowner and the owner or operator shall equally share the cost of the mediator’s services. The mediation provisions of this section do not prevent or delay an owner or operator from conducting oil and gas operations in accordance with applicable law.

A surface use bond shall be furnished to the department by the owner or operator in accordance with the following provisions:

A surface use bond does not apply to surface land where the surface landowner is a party or a successor of a party to:

A lease of the underlying privately owned oil and gas;

A surface use agreement applicable to the surface landowner’s surface land; or

A contract, waiver or release addressing an owner’s or operator’s use of the surface landowner’s surface land.

The surface use bond shall be in the amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000) per well site and shall be conditioned upon the performance by the owner or operator of the duty to protect a surface landowner against unreasonable loss of crops on surface land, unreasonable loss of value of existing improvements, and unreasonable permanent damage to surface land.

The surface use bond shall be furnished to the department on a form designed by the department after good faith negotiation and prior to the approval of the application for a permit to drill. The mediation process identified in this section may commence and is encouraged to be completed. The department may accept a surface use bond in the form of a cash account or a certificate of deposit. Interest will remain within the account. The department may allow the owner or operator, or a subsequent owner or operator, to replace an existing surface use bond with another bond that provides sufficient coverage. The surface use bond shall remain in effect by the operator until released by the department.

The surface use bond shall be payable to the department for the use and benefit of the surface landowner, subject to this section. The surface use bond shall be released to the owner or operator after the department receives sufficient information that:

A surface use agreement or other contractual arrangement has been reached;

Final resolution of the judicial appeal process for an action for unreasonable damages has occurred and damages have been paid; or

Plugging and abandonment of the well is completed.

The department shall make a reasonable effort to contact the surface landowner prior to the department’s release of the surface use bond.

§ 47-335. Producers — Monthly statements — Idaho state tax commission.

Every producer engaged in the production of oil or gas from any well or wells in the state shall each month file with the Idaho state tax commission, on forms prescribed by the Idaho state tax commission, a statement containing the information required by subsection (2) of this section relating to the oil or gas produced, saved and sold or transported from the premises in Idaho where produced.

The statement required in subsection (1) of this section shall include:

The name, description and location of:

Every well or wells; and

Every field in which the well or wells are located; and

Any other reasonable and necessary information required by the Idaho state tax commission.

The statements required to be filed with the Idaho state tax commission shall be signed and sworn to by the producer or a designee.

The Idaho state tax commission is authorized to conduct audits, relating to producer compliance with the provisions of this section, at least every three (3) years.

§ 47-336. Interstate compact for conservation of oil and gas ratified.

The state of Idaho does hereby ratify, approve, adopt and confirm the interstate compact to conserve oil and gas heretofore executed in the city of Dallas, Texas, on February 16, 1935, and is now deposited with the department of state of the United States and which has been extended with the consent of congress to September 1, 1947, which said compact is substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

This agreement may become effective within any compacting state at any time as prescribed by that state, and shall become effective within those states ratifying it whenever any three of the states of Texas, Oklahoma, California, Kansas and New Mexico have ratified and congress has given its consent. Any oil-producing state may become a party hereto as hereinafter provided.

ARTICLE II

The purpose of this compact is to conserve oil and gas by the prevention of physical waste thereof from any cause.

ARTICLE III

Each state bound hereby agrees that within a reasonable time it will enact laws, or if the laws have been enacted, then it agrees to continue the same in force, to accomplish within reasonable limits the prevention of:

The operation of any oil well with an inefficient gas-oil ratio.

The drowning with water of any stratum capable of producing oil or gas, or both oil and gas, in paying quantities.

The avoidable escape into the open air or the wasteful burning of gas from a natural gas well.

The creation of unnecessary fire hazards.

The drilling, equipping, locating, spacing or operating of a well or wells so as to bring about physical waste of oil or gas or loss in the ultimate recovery thereof.

The inefficient, excessive or improper use of the reservoir energy in producing any well.

The enumeration of the foregoing subjects shall not limit the scope of the authority of any state.

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE VI

Each state joining herein shall appoint one representative to a commission hereby constituted and designated as “The Interstate Oil Compact Commission,” the duty of which said commission shall be to make inquiry and ascertain from time to time such methods, practices, circumstances, and conditions as may be disclosed for bringing about conservation and the prevention of physical waste of oil and gas, and at such intervals as said commission deems beneficial it shall report its findings and recommendations to the several states for adoption or rejection.

The commission shall have the power to recommend the coordination of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their several jurisdictions to promote the maximum ultimate recovery from the petroleum reserves of said states, and to recommend measures for the maximum ultimate recovery of oil and gas. Said commission shall organize and adopt suitable rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.

No action shall be taken by the commission except: (1) by the affirmative votes of the majority of the whole number of the compacting states represented at any meeting, and (2) by a concurring vote of a majority in interest of the compacting states at said meeting, such interest to be determined as follows: such vote of each state shall be in the decimal proportion fixed by the ratio of its daily average production during the preceding calendar half-year to the daily average production of the compacting states during said period.

ARTICLE VII

No state joining herein shall become financially obligated to any other state, nor shall the breach of the terms hereof by any state subject such state to financial responsibility to the other states joining herein.